Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.03
Accredited training program, defined.

Accredited training program means a training program that has been accredited by the department to provide training for individuals engaged in lead-based paint activities.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 5.